Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
FISCAL REPORTING
SECTION 1.
 ORS 293.229 is amended to read:
293.229. (1) Not later than October 1 of each fiscal year,  each state agency shall submit a report
to the Legislative Fiscal Office that describes  the status of that agency’s liquidated and delinquent
accounts  and  efforts made by that agency to collect liquidated and delinquent accounts during the
previous fiscal year. The report required under this subsection shall be in a form prescribed by  the
Legislative Fiscal Office and shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Beginning balance and total number of all liquidated and delinquent accounts;
(b) New liquidated and delinquent accounts added during the last preceding fiscal year;
(c) Total collections of liquidated and delinquent accounts;
(d) Total amount and total number of liquidated and delinquent accounts that have been  written
off;
(e) Total number and ending balance of all liquidated and delinquent accounts;
(f) Total  amount of liquidated and delinquent accounts assigned to the Department of Revenue
and the total amount collected by the department under ORS 293.250;
(g) Total amount of liquidated and delinquent  accounts assigned to private collection agencies
and the total amount collected by private collection agencies under ORS 293.231;
(h) Total number  and total amount of all liquidated and delinquent accounts exempted under
ORS 293.233;
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 1
(i) Total number and ending balance of all liquidated and delinquent accounts that have  been
placed in suspended collection status under ORS 305.155; and
(j) A statement indicating whether the agency has liquidated and delinquent accounts that are
not exempt under ORS 293.233, or are otherwise prohibited or exempted  by law from assignment, for
which no payment has been received for more than 90 days and that have not been assigned  to the
Department of Revenue under ORS 293.231.
(2) If a state agency reports under subsection  (1) of this section that the total ending balance
of its liquidated and delinquent  accounts is $50 million or greater, the state agency shall, not later
than three months after it submits the  report under subsection (1) of this section, submit an addi-
tional report to the committees or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to  ways
and means that:
(a) Describes major categories of liquidated and delinquent accounts held by the state agency;
(b) Describes circumstances under  which the state agency writes off or adjusts liquidated and
delinquent amounts or removes an account from liquidated and delinquent status;
(c) Describes actions undertaken by the state agency to reduce the  amount of liquidated and
delinquent debt owed to it at the end of each fiscal year; and
(d) Sets forth a plan for future actions that will  reduce the amount of liquidated and delinquent
debt owed to the state agency at the end of  each fiscal year and describes any additional resources
that are necessary to carry out the plan.
(3) The Legislative Fiscal Office shall produce  an annual report not later than [ December 31 ]
February 1 of each fiscal year on the status of liquidated and delinquent accounts of  state agencies
and the  judicial branch of state government. The report shall be based on the reports submitted by
state agencies as required in this section and on reports submitted by the  judicial branch of state
government under ORS 1.195.
(4) The report required under subsection (3) of this section shall:
(a) List those state agencies, including the judicial branch of state government, that have  liq-
uidated and delinquent accounts that are not exempt under ORS 1.198, 1.199 or 293.233, or are  oth-
erwise prohibited or exempted by law from assignment,  for which no payment has been received for
more than 90 days and that have not been assigned to a private collection  agency or to the De-
partment of Revenue under ORS 1.197 or assigned to the Department of Revenue under 293.231;
(b) List  separately information about the liquidated and delinquent accounts of the Secretary
of State, the State Treasurer, other state agencies in the executive branch of  state government and
the judicial branch of state government; and
(c) Include any other information the Legislative Fiscal Office determines is necessary  to de-
scribe the status of liquidated and delinquent accounts across offices and branches of  state govern-
ment.
(5) Notwithstanding ORS 293.227, as used in this section, “state agency” has  the meaning given
that term in ORS 293.226, except that it:
(a) Does not include  the judicial department as defined in ORS 174.113 or the legislative de-
partment as defined in ORS 174.114; and
(b) Includes public universities listed in ORS 352.002  and Oregon Health and Science University,
notwithstanding ORS 352.138 and 353.100.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 293.252 is amended to read:
293.252. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall monitor  state agency debt
collection functions described by law  and assist state agencies in efforts to improve the collection
of delinquent debts owed to state agencies. The  department’s duties under this subsection include,
but are not limited to:
(a) Providing training to state agencies regarding processing and managing  accounts receivable
in compliance with applicable law and state policies.
(b) Providing technical assistance to state agencies in resolving challenges in processing  and
managing accounts receivable and developing financial administrative systems to  improve the han-
dling of liquidated and delinquent accounts.
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 2
(c) Developing performance standards for  state debt collection, including but not limited to
standards defining what constitutes liquidated and  delinquent accounts and when debt may be
written off pursuant to ORS 293.240.
(d) Working with state agencies to improve the quality and value of data that  each state agency
submits to the Legislative Fiscal Office for purposes of ORS 293.229.
(e) Submitting an annual management  report to the Legislative Assembly not later than [ De-
cember 31 ] February 1 of each fiscal year,  in conjunction with the report of the Legislative Fiscal
Office produced under ORS 293.229, that identifies  important issues and significant trends in state
agency debt collection practices and describes and evaluates efforts  by state agencies to improve
the collection of delinquent debt.
(2) The department shall adopt policies:
(a) Providing guidance for the collection of liquidated and delinquent accounts owing to state
agencies.
(b) Setting procedures for state agencies to account for and manage information  regarding the
agency’s liquidated and delinquent accounts.
(c) After consultation  with the Attorney General, setting criteria for effective and efficient as-
signment of liquidated and delinquent accounts to the Department  of Revenue or private collection
agencies, and setting performance measurements to be used in the application of the criteria.
(d) For the allocation, form and amount of charges or fees added  to liquidated and delinquent
accounts under ORS 293.231, 293.250 and 697.105.
(e) Setting exemptions or adjustments for state agencies that are  prohibited by law from adding
or collecting fees under ORS 293.231, 293.250 or 697.105 and for agencies  for which the addition or
collection of the fees is not feasible given the agency resources available for collection of  accounts
receivable.
(f) For the improvement  of communications regarding liquidated and delinquent accounts among
state agencies and between private collection agencies and the Department of Revenue.
(g) Describing conditions under which a state agency may request and collect Social Security
numbers in accordance with state and federal law when it is reasonably foreseeable  that a person
may owe the state agency a liquidated and delinquent amount as a result of a transaction or activ-
ity.
(h) After consultation with  the Attorney General, setting criteria under which state agencies,
the Department of Revenue and private collection agencies may propose and  accept offers of com-
promise as provided in ORS 293.240.
(3) As used in  this section, “state agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 293.226,
except that it does not include the  judicial department as defined in ORS 174.113, the Secretary of
State or the State Treasurer.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 291.227 is amended to read:
291.227. (1)(a) As part of the development of the  legislatively adopted budget, each state agency
that employs more than 100 employees shall report to the Joint  Committee on Ways and Means the
state agency’s maximum supervisory ratio for the biennium.
(b) Before submitting the  report to the committee, a state agency shall provide a copy of the
report to all labor organizations that represent employees of the state agency.
(2) A state agency must determine its maximum supervisory ratio by  starting from a baseline
ratio of one to 11 and adjusting the ratio based on some or all of the following factors:
(a) Safety of the public or of state agency employees;
(b) Geographic location of the agency’s employees;
(c) Complexity of the agency’s duties;
(d) Industry best practices and standards;
(e) Size and hours of operation of the agency;
(f) Unique personnel  needs of the agency, including the agency’s use of volunteers or seasonal
or temporary employees,  or the exercise of supervisory authority by agency supervisory employees
over personnel who are not agency employees; and
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 3
(g) Financial scope and responsibility of the agency.
(3) The Joint Committee on  Ways and Means shall review the maximum supervisory ratios re-
ported by state agencies. [ The committee shall include the maximum supervisory  ratio in a budget
report or budget note for each state agency that reported a maximum supervisory ratio. ]
(4) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, a state agency whose actual  supervisory ratio is
greater than its maximum supervisory ratio may not fill a supervisory position.
(5)(a) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may exempt  a state agency from the
limitations of subsection  (4) of this section if the department determines that an additional supervi-
sory position is reasonably necessary to the state agency. The department must make the  determi-
nation with reference to some or all of the factors set forth in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) At least  five business days before granting an exemption under this subsection, the depart-
ment shall notify all labor organizations that represent employees of the state agency of its intent
to grant the exemption.
(6)(a) The department shall, once per quarter, produce reports on the  actual supervisory ratio
of each state agency. The reports must include data  on job families within each state agency to the
extent such data is reasonably available.
(b) The department shall make the reports  publicly available on the Internet and shall notify
all labor organizations that represent state employees when the reports are available.
(7) The department  may adopt rules for the administration of this section, including rules gov-
erning how  temporary, seasonal or part-time employees are accounted for in the calculation of a
supervisory ratio.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) “Job families” means groups of occupations based upon work performed,  skills, education,
training and credentials.
(b) “Legislatively adopted budget” has the meaning given that term in ORS 291.002.
(c)(A) “State agency” means  all state officers, boards, commissions, departments, institutions,
branches, agencies, divisions and other entities, without regard to the designation given  to those
entities, that are within the executive branch of government as described  in Article III, section 1,
of the Oregon Constitution.
(B) “State agency” does not include:
(i) The legislative department as defined in ORS 174.114;
(ii) The judicial department as defined in ORS 174.113;
(iii) The Public Defense Services Commission;
(iv) The Secretary of State and the State Treasurer;
(v) Semi-independent state agencies listed in ORS 182.454;
(vi) The Oregon Tourism Commission;
(vii) The Oregon Film and Video Office;
(viii) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002;
(ix) The Oregon Health and Science University;
(x) The Travel Information Council;
(xi) Oregon Corrections Enterprises;
(xii) The Oregon State Lottery Commission;
(xiii) The State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation;
(xiv) The Oregon Utility Notification Center;
(xv) Oregon Community Power;
(xvi) The Citizens’ Utility Board;
(xvii) A special government body as defined in ORS 174.117;
(xviii) Any other  public corporation created under a statute of this state and specifically desig-
nated as a public corporation; and
(xix) Any other  semi-independent state agency denominated by statute as a semi-independent
state agency.
(d) “Supervisory employee” has the meaning given that term in ORS 243.650.
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 4
(e) “Supervisory ratio” means the ratio of employees  who are supervisory employees to em-
ployees who are not supervisory employees.
OREGON MEDICAL BOARD
SECTION 4. Section 6, chapter 643, Oregon Laws 2019, is repealed.
OREGON TRANSPARENCY WEBSITE
SECTION 5.  ORS 276A.253 is amended to read:
276A.253. (1)(a) The State Chief  Information Officer shall maintain and make available an
Oregon transparency website. The website must allow any person to  view information that is a
public record and is not exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478, including but  not
limited to information described in subsection (3) of  this section. The State Chief Information Officer
shall provide on the home  page of the website a method for users to offer suggestions regarding the
form or content of the website.
(b) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall assist the State Chief  Information
Officer in performing  duties under paragraph (a) of this subsection to the extent the State Chief
Information Officer deems the assistance necessary.
(2) State agencies and education service districts, to the extent practicable and subject  to laws
relating to confidentiality, when at no additional cost, using existing data and existing  resources of
the state agency or education service district and without reallocation of resources, shall:
(a) Furnish information to the Oregon transparency website by posting reports  and providing
links to existing information system applications in accordance with standards  that the State Chief
Information Officer establishes; and
(b) Provide the information in the format  and manner that the State Chief Information Officer
requires.
(3) To the extent practicable and subject to laws relating to confidentiality, when at  no addi-
tional cost, using existing data and  existing resources of the state agency or education service dis-
trict and without reallocation of resources, the Oregon transparency website must  contain
information about each state agency and education service district, including but not limited to:
(a) Annual revenues of state agencies and education service districts;
(b) Annual expenditures of state agencies and education service districts;
(c) Annual human resources expenses, including compensation, of state agencies and  education
service districts;
(d) Annual tax expenditures of  state agencies, including, when possible, the identity of the re-
cipients of each tax expenditure;
(e) For each state agency, a description of  the percentage of expenditures made in this state and
the percentage of expenditures made outside  this state under all contracts for goods or services the
state agency enters into during each biennium;
(f) A prominently placed graphic representation of the primary funding  categories and approxi-
mate number of individuals that the state agency or the education service district serves;
(g) A description of the mission, function and program categories of the  state agency or educa-
tion service district;
(h) A copy of any audit report that the  Secretary of State issues for the state agency or the
education service district;
(i) The local service plans of the education service districts;
(j) A copy of each report required by statute for education service districts; and
(k) A copy of all notices of public meetings of the education service districts.
(4) In addition to the information described in subsection (3) of this section:
(a) The State Chief Information Officer shall post  on the Oregon transparency website notices
of public meetings the state agency must  provide under ORS 192.640. If the state agency maintains
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 5
a website where minutes or  summaries of the public meetings are available, the state agency shall
provide the State Chief Information Officer with the link to  the state agency website for posting on
the Oregon transparency website.
(b) The State Chief Information Officer shall post on the Oregon transparency website  a link for
the website  that the Secretary of State maintains for rules that the state agency adopts. If the state
agency maintains a website  where the state agency posts the rules, or where any information re-
lating to the rules of the agency is posted, the state agency shall provide the State Chief Information
Officer with the link to the website for posting on the Oregon transparency website.
(c) The State Chief Information Officer shall provide links  on the Oregon transparency website
for information  that the State Chief Information Officer receives concerning contracts and subcon-
tracts that a state agency or  education service district enters into, to the extent that disclosing the
information is allowed by law and the information is already available on websites  that the state
agency or education service district maintains. To  the extent available, the information to which the
State Chief Information Officer links under this section must include:
(A) Information on professional, personal and material contracts;
(B) The date of each contract and the amount payable under the contract;
(C) The period during which the contract is or was in effect; and
(D) The names and addresses of vendors.
(d) The State Chief Information Officer shall provide an economic development section on  the
Oregon transparency website for posting of information submitted to  the State Chief Information
Officer by state agencies responsible  for administering specific economic development programs. The
section shall include, but not be limited to, the following information, if it is already collected or
available within an existing database maintained by  the state agency in the course of administering
the economic development program:
(A) The names of filmmakers or companies that have received reimbursements from  the Oregon
Production Investment Fund under ORS 284.368 and the amount of each reimbursement;
(B) The amount of revenue bonds issued under ORS  285A.430 for the Beginning and Expanding
Farmer Loan Program, the  names of persons who received loans under the program and the amount
of the loan;
(C) The names of  persons who received grants, loans or equity investments from the Oregon
Innovation Council under ORS 284.742 and the purpose and amount of the  grant, loan or equity in-
vestment;
(D) Copies of, or links to, annual reports required to be filed under ORS 285C.615 under  the
strategic investment program;
(E) Copies of, or links to, annual certifications required to be filed under ORS  285C.506 for the
business development income tax exemption; and
(F) Information required to be posted on the  Oregon transparency website under ORS 276A.256.
(e) The information reported under paragraph (d) of this subsection:
(A) May not include proprietary information; and
(B) Shall be provided to the  State Chief Information Officer by the state agency in the format
and manner required by the State Chief Information Officer.
(f) The State Chief  Information Officer shall post on the Oregon transparency website informa-
tion describing the process for requesting  copies of public records from a public body, including a
link to the public records section of the Department of Justice webpage. At the request of a  state
agency or education service district, the  State Chief Information Officer shall include a link to a
location on the webpage of the agency  or district that describes the process for requesting public
records from the agency or district.
(5) In operating, refining and recommending enhancements to the Oregon  transparency website,
the State Chief Information  Officer and the Transparency Oregon Advisory Commission created in
ORS 276A.259 shall consider and, to the extent practicable, adhere to the following principles:
(a) The website must be accessible without cost and be easy to use;
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 6
(b) Information included on the Oregon transparency website must be presented using  plain,
easily understandable language; and
(c) The website should teach users  about how state government and education service districts
work and provide users  with the opportunity to learn something about how state government and
education service districts raise and spend revenue.
(6) If a state agency or an education service district is not  able to include information described
in this section on the Oregon transparency website because of  the lack of availability of information
or cost in acquiring  information, the Transparency Oregon Advisory Commission created in ORS
276A.259 shall list the information  that is not included for the state agency or education service
district in the commission’s report to the Legislative Assembly required under ORS 276A.259.
(7)(a) For  the purpose of providing transparency in the revenues, expenditures and budgets of
the following entities, the State Chief Information Officer shall include on  the Oregon transparency
website a page that provides links to websites established by:
(A) Local governments, as defined in ORS 174.116.
(B) Special government bodies, as defined in ORS 174.117.
(C) Semi-independent state agencies listed in ORS 182.454.
(D) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002.
(E) Public university statewide programs operated by a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(F) The Oregon Health and Science University.
(G) The Oregon Tourism Commission.
(H) The Oregon Film and Video Office.
(I) The Travel Information Council.
(J) The Children’s Trust Fund of Oregon Foundation.
(K) Oregon Corrections Enterprises.
(L) The State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(M) The Oregon Utility Notification Center.
(N) Any public corporation created under a statute of this state and specifically designated  as
a public corporation.
(b) The State Chief Information Officer shall include a link to an  entity’s website after receiving
a request  from the entity and shall consider recommendations from the Transparency Oregon Advi-
sory Commission for including other links to websites  of the entities listed in paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(c) At the  request of any local government, as defined in ORS 174.116, or special government
body, as defined in ORS  174.117, the State Chief Information Officer shall include on the Oregon
transparency website notices of public meetings required to be provided under ORS 192.640  by the
local government or special government body. The  local government or special government body
must submit public meeting notice information in the format  and manner required by the State Chief
Information Officer.
(d) The office of the State Chief Information Officer shall include a  prominent link on the home
page of the Oregon transparency website for information posted to  the page described in paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
(8) Nothing in this section  prohibits the State Chief Information Officer or the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services from incurring costs or requesting additional re-
sources to develop, maintain or enhance the Oregon transparency website.
NONSTATE EMPLOYEE COLLECTIVE BARGAINING
SECTION 6.
 ORS 410.612 is amended to read:
410.612. (1) For purposes of collective bargaining under ORS 243.650 to 243.806, the Home  Care
Commission is the employer of record for home care workers and personal support workers.
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 7
(2) Except as provided  in ORS 410.614 and 410.619, home care workers and personal support
workers may not be  considered to be employees of the State of Oregon, an area agency, a support
services brokerage or other public agency.
(3)(a) The  Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall represent the commission in
collective bargaining negotiations with the certified or recognized exclusive  representatives of all
appropriate bargaining units of home care  workers and personal support workers. The department
is authorized to agree to terms and conditions of collective bargaining agreements  on behalf of the
commission and the Department of Human Services.
(b) The Oregon Department  of Administrative Services shall report to the legislative re-
view agency, as defined in ORS  291.371, on any new or changed provisions relating to com-
pensation in a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this section.
SECTION 7.  ORS 329A.430 is amended to read:
329A.430. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Certified family child care provider”  means an individual who operates a family child care
home that is certified under ORS 329A.280.
(b) “Child care subsidy” means a payment made by  the state on behalf of eligible children for
child care services provided for periods of less than 24 hours in a day.
(c) “Exempt  family child care provider” means an individual who provides child care services
in the home of the individual or in the home  of the child, whose services are not required to be
certified or registered under ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450 and who receives a child care subsidy.
(d) “Family child care provider” means an individual  who is a certified, registered or exempt
family child care provider.
(e) “Registered family child care provider” means an  individual who operates a family child care
home that is registered under ORS 329A.330.
(2) For purposes of collective bargaining under ORS 243.650 to 243.806, the State  of Oregon is
the public employer of record of family child care providers.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 243.650 (19), family child care providers  are considered to be public
employees governed by ORS 243.650 to 243.806. Family child care providers have  the right to form,
join and  participate in the activities of labor organizations of their own choosing for the purpose
of representation and collective bargaining on matters concerning  labor relations. These rights shall
be exercised  in accordance with the rights granted to public employees, with mediation and interest
arbitration under ORS 243.742 as the  method of concluding the collective bargaining process. Family
child care providers may not strike.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (2)  and (3) of this section, family child care providers are not
for any other purpose employees of the State of Oregon or any other public body.
(5)(a) The Oregon Department of Administrative  Services shall represent the State of Oregon
in collective bargaining negotiations with the certified or recognized exclusive representatives  of
all appropriate bargaining units of family child care providers. The Oregon  Department of Admin-
istrative Services is authorized to agree to terms and conditions  of collective bargaining agreements
on behalf of the State of Oregon.
(b) The department shall report  to the legislative review agency, as defined in ORS
291.371, on any new or changed provisions relating to compensation  in a collective bargaining
agreement negotiated under this section.
(6) Notwithstanding ORS 243.650 (1):
(a) The appropriate bargaining unit  for certified and registered family child care providers is a
bargaining unit of all certified and registered family child care providers in the state.
(b) The appropriate bargaining unit for exempt family  child care providers is a bargaining unit
of all exempt family child care providers in the state.
(7) This section does not modify any right of a parent or legal guardian to  choose and terminate
the services of a family child care provider.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 443.733 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 8
443.733. (1) As used in this section, “adult foster care home provider” means a  person who op-
erates an adult  foster home in the provider’s home and who receives fees or payments from state
funds for providing adult foster  care home services. “Adult foster care home provider” does not in-
clude a person:
(a) Who is a resident  manager of an adult foster home who does not provide adult foster care
home services in the  resident manager’s own home or who does not have a controlling interest in,
or is not an officer or partner in, the entity that is the provider of adult foster  care home services;
(b) Who is not a natural person; or
(c) Whose participation in  collective bargaining is determined by the licensing agency to be in-
consistent with this section or in violation of state or federal law.
(2) For purposes of collective bargaining under ORS 243.650 to 243.806, the State  of Oregon is
the public employer of record of adult foster care home providers.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 243.650 (19), adult foster care home providers are  considered to be
public employees governed by ORS 243.650 to 243.806. Adult foster  care home providers have the
right to form, join  and participate in the activities of labor organizations of their own choosing for
the purposes of representation and  collective bargaining on matters concerning labor relations.
Mandatory subjects of collective bargaining include but are not limited to provider base rates  and
add-on payments. These rights shall be exercised  in accordance with the rights granted to public
employees, with mediation and interest arbitration under ORS 243.742 as  the method of concluding
the collective bargaining process. Adult foster care home providers may not strike.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, adult foster care home providers  are
not for any other purpose employees of the State of Oregon or any other public body.
(5)(a) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall  represent the State of Oregon
in collective bargaining negotiations with the certified or recognized exclusive representative of an
appropriate  bargaining  unit of adult foster care home providers. The Oregon Department of Admin-
istrative Services is authorized to agree to terms and conditions  of collective bargaining agreements
on behalf of the State of Oregon.
(b) The department shall report  to the legislative review agency, as defined in ORS
291.371, on any new or changed provisions relating to compensation  in a collective bargaining
agreement negotiated under this section.
(6) Notwithstanding ORS 243.650 (1), an appropriate bargaining unit  for adult foster care home
providers is any bargaining unit recognized by the Governor in an executive order  issued prior to
January 1, 2008.
(7) This section does not modify any right of an adult receiving foster care.
DEBT SERVICE
SECTION 9.
 Section 4, chapter 609, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  There is  appropriated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $32,479,290 for debt service on [ Article XI-P ] general
obligation bonds.
SECTION 10.  Section 6, chapter 609, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  following amounts are estab-
lished for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment of expenses, other
than expenses described in sections 7 and  10, chapter 609, Oregon Laws 2019 [, of this 2019 Act ],
from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds
and federal funds, collected  or received by the Department of Education, for the following purposes:
(1) Capital bonding ................................. $ 130,000,000
(2) Operations ...........................................$ 46,360,200
(3) Oregon School for the Deaf ........... $ 6,281,693
(4) Debt service for outstanding
general obligation bonds [ sold]
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 9
[pursuant to Article XI-P of the ]
[Oregon Constitution ]........................ $ 1
SECTION 11.  Section 5a, chapter 642, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 5a.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the amount of $1 is established
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds  from the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described in this  section, collected or received by the Housing and
Community Services Department, for debt service [ and related costs for outstanding general obli-
gation bonds sold pursuant to Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution ].
PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT SYSTEM
SECTION 12. Section 13 of this 2020 second special session Act is added to and  made a
part of ORS chapter 238.
SECTION 13. At least 30  days before crediting any interest or other income received
through investment of moneys  to any fund or account, the Public Employees Retirement
Board shall submit a preliminary proposal for crediting to the  appropriate legislative review
agency, as defined in ORS 291.371,  for its review and comment. The proposal shall identify
gross earnings, investment expenses and administrative  expenses, by fund or account, re-
lated to the crediting of the interest or other income.
SECTION 14.  ORS 238.670 is amended to read:
238.670. (1) At the close of each calendar year in which the earnings on the Public  Employees
Retirement Fund equal or exceed the assumed interest  rate established by the Public Employees
Retirement Board under ORS 238.255, the board shall set aside,  out of interest and other income
received through investment of the Public Employees Retirement Fund during  that calendar year,
such part of the income as  the board may deem advisable, not exceeding seven and one-half percent
of the combined total of such  income, which moneys so segregated shall remain in the fund and
constitute therein a reserve account. The board shall continue to credit the reserve  account in the
manner required by this subsection until the board determines that  the reserve account is ade-
quately funded for the purposes specified in this subsection, but the board may not credit  further
amounts to the reserve account if the amounts in the reserve  account exceed $50 million. Such re-
serve account shall be maintained and used by the  board to prevent any deficit of moneys available
for the payment of retirement allowances, due to  interest fluctuations, changes in mortality rate or,
except as provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this  section, other contingency. In addition, the reserve
account may be used by the board for the following purposes:
(a) To prevent any deficit in the fund by  reason of the insolvency of a participating public em-
ployer. Reserves under this paragraph may  be funded only from the earnings on employer contrib-
utions made under ORS 238.225.
(b) To  pay any legal expenses or judgments that do not arise in the ordinary course of adjudi-
cating an individual member’s benefits or an individual employer’s liabilities.
(2) At  the close of each calendar year, the board shall set aside, out of interest and other income
received during the calendar year, after  deducting the amounts provided by law and to the extent
that such income is available, a sufficient amount to credit to the reserves for pension  accounts and
annuities varying percentage amounts adopted by  the board as a result of periodic actuarial inves-
tigations. If total income available for distribution exceeds those  percentages of the total accumu-
lated contributions of employees and employers,  the reserves for pensions and annuities shall
participate in such excess.
(3) The board may set aside, out of interest and other income received through investment of
the fund, such part of  the income as the board considers necessary, which moneys so segregated
shall remain in the fund and constitute one or more reserve accounts. Such reserve  accounts shall
be maintained and used by the board to offset gains and losses of invested capital. The board, from
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 10
time to time, may cause to be transferred from the reserve account provided for  in subsection (1)
of this section to a reserve account provided for in this subsection such amount as the board de-
termines to  be unnecessary for the purposes set forth in subsection (1) of this section and to be
necessary for the purposes set forth in this subsection.
(4) The  board may provide for amortizing gains and losses of invested capital in such instances
as the board determines that amortization is preferable to a  reserve account provided for in sub-
section (3) of this section.
[(5) At least 30 days before  crediting any interest and other income received through investment
of the Public Employees Retirement Fund to any reserve account in  the fund, the board shall submit
a preliminary proposal for  crediting to the appropriate legislative review agency, as defined in ORS
291.371 (1), for its review and comment. ]
SECTION 15.
Section 63, chapter 355, Oregon Laws 2019, is repealed.
SECTION 15a.  Section 45a, chapter 355, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 45a.  Sections 44 and  45 [ of this 2019 Act ], chapter 355, Oregon Laws 2019,  are repealed
on [ December 31, 2041 ] the effective date of this 2020 second special session Act .
SECTION 16. Section 3, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2018, as  amended by section 48, chapter 355,
Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) Section 2,  chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2018, as amended by section 47 , chapter 355,
Oregon Laws 2019[, of this 2019 Act ], is repealed July 1, 2042.
(2)(a) The Employer Incentive Fund established under section 1, chapter 105, Oregon  Laws 2018,
is abolished on July 1, 2042.
(b)[(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, ] The unexpended moneys  re-
maining in the Employer Incentive Fund on July 1, 2042, shall be transferred to the General Fund.
[(B) The unexpended moneys remaining  in the Employer Incentive Fund on July 1, 2042, that are
attributable to sports betting games, as defined  in ORS 461.010, shall be transferred to the Adminis-
trative Services Economic Development Fund. ]
SECTION 17. Section 31, chapter 101, Oregon Laws 2018, is repealed.
SECTION 18. (1) Sections 12a, 14 and 16, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2018, are repealed.
(2) Section 13, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2018, as amended by  section 49, chapter 355,
Oregon Laws 2019, is repealed.
(3) Section 15, chapter 105,  Oregon Laws 2018, as amended by section 50, chapter 355,
Oregon Laws 2019, is repealed.
SECTION 18a.  Section 12b, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
Sec. 12b.  Section 12 , chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2018,  [ of this 2018 Act ] is repealed on [ De-
cember 31, 2024 ] the effective date of this 2020 second special session Act .
SECTION 18b. Section 85, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 85.  (1) Sections 1 to 6 , chapter  678, Oregon Laws 2019,  [ of this 2019 Act ] become opera-
tive on July 1, 2021.
(2) The amendments to statutes and session law by sections 7 to 80 , chapter 678, Oregon Laws
2019, [ of this 2019 Act ] become operative on July 1, 2021.
(3) The amendments to section 22, chapter  105, Oregon Laws 2018, by section 81 , chapter 678,
Oregon Laws 2019, [ of this 2019 Act ] become operative on [ January 1, 2022] the effective date of
this 2020 second special session Act .
(4) The amendments to section 22, chapter  105, Oregon Laws 2018, by section 82 , chapter 678,
Oregon Laws 2019, [ of this 2019 Act ] become operative on [ January 1, 2023] the effective date of
this 2020 second special session Act .
(5) The State Treasurer, the Department of State Lands and the State Land  Board may take any
actions  before  the operative dates specified in subsections (1) to (4) of this section necessary to en-
able the State Treasurer to exercise, on and  after the operative dates specified in subsections (1) to
(4) of  this section, the duties, functions and powers required under chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019
[this 2019 Act ].
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 11
SECTION 18c.  Section 23, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2018, as amended by section 83,  chapter
678, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 23.  Section 22, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2018, as amended by sections 81 and 82 , chapter
678, Oregon Laws 2019  [ of this 2019 Act ], is repealed on [ January 2, 2027 ] the effective  date of
this 2020 second special session Act .
SECTION 19.  Section 24, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2018, as amended  by section 51, chapter
355, Oregon Laws 2019 is amended to read:
Sec. 24.  (1) The School Districts Unfunded Liability Fund is  established in the State Treasury,
separate and  distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the School Districts Unfunded Li-
ability Fund shall be credited to the fund. The fund consists of [ moneys transferred to the fund  under
sections 12, 13, 15 and 22, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2018, and other ] moneys transferred, allocated
or appropriated to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Public Employees Retirement Board
for the purpose of establishing and funding a pooled account to  be applied against the liabilities of
participating public employers, as defined in ORS 238.005, that are school districts.
(3) Moneys in the fund  shall be invested in the Oregon Short Term Fund established under ORS
293.728.
(4) The board shall establish an account in the  Public Employees Retirement Fund for the
moneys in the School Districts Unfunded Liability Fund.
(5) The board shall adopt rules providing for:
(a) Proportional distribution to school  districts of the moneys in the account established under
subsection (4) of this section;
(b) Amortization of the moneys distributed; and
(c) Administration of the account established under  subsection (4) of this section in the same
manner as accounts established under ORS 238.229 (2).
(6) No later than February 1 of each odd-numbered year, the board shall report to the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services and the Legislative  Fiscal Officer an estimate of how moneys
will be distributed under this section in the following biennium.
GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATION BALANCES
SECTION 20.
 ORS 293.195 is amended to read:
293.195. (1) Any difference  between the amount appropriated  from the General Fund  for a
biennium to the judicial  department as defined in ORS 174.113, including amounts appropriated to
any agency of  the judicial department, and the amount of the appropriation actually expended on
or before the end of the biennium, is [ continuously] appropriated to the judicial department , out of
the General Fund,  for payment of expenses of the judicial department for the next biennium.
(2) Any difference between the amount appropriated from the General Fund  for a biennium to
the legislative department as  defined in ORS 174.114, including amounts appropriated to any agency
of the legislative department, and the amount of  the appropriation actually expended on or before
the end of the biennium, is [ continuously] appropriated  to the legislative department , out of the
General Fund, for payment of expenses of the legislative department for the next biennium.
(3) The appropriations made by subsections (1) and (2) of this section are subject to ad-
justment by the Legislative Assembly. The Legislative  Assembly shall reflect the appropri-
ations, including any adjustments thereto, in an appropriation  measure during each
biennium.
OREGON BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT DEPARTMENT
SECTION 21. (1) The Tide Gate Grant and Loan Fund is established in  the State Treas-
ury, separate  and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Tide Gate Grant
and Loan Fund must be credited to the fund.
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 12
(2) The fund consists of:
(a) Moneys allocated to the Oregon  Business Development Department under section 3
(4), chapter 670, Oregon Laws 2019;
(b) Moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited  or transferred to the fund by the Legisla-
tive Assembly or otherwise;
(c) Repayments, including interest, of disbursements from the fund;
(d) Moneys received for deposit in the  fund from the federal government, state agencies
or local governments; and
(e) Interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(3) The moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the  department for the
purposes specified in section 22 of this 2020 second special session Act.
SECTION 22.
(1) The  Oregon Business Development Department may directly or indi-
rectly grant, expend or lend moneys from the Tide  Gate Grant and Loan Fund established
under section 21 of this 2020 second special session Act to:
(a) Provide grants or loans to plan or construct tide gates, culverts  and associated
drainage infrastructure;
(b) Obtain professional services for tide  gate coordination or for technical studies that
have a statewide benefit for tide gate project development; or
(c) Pay administrative expenses of the department incurred in carrying  out the pro-
visions of this section, including costs of investigating and processing an application,  devel-
oping contracts, monitoring use of grants or loans by a recipient, investigating and  resolving
budget discrepancies, closing a project and  providing financial and other assistance associ-
ated with expenditures from the fund.
(2) The department shall adopt rules necessary to carry out the provisions of  this sec-
tion.
SECTION 22a. The Tide Gate Grant  and Loan Fund established under section 21 of this
2020 second special session Act is abolished on June 30, 2023. Any moneys remaining  in the
fund on that date shall be transferred to the Administrative  Services Economic Development
Fund established under ORS 461.540.
SECTION 23. Sections 21 and 22 of this 2020  second special session Act are repealed on
June 30, 2023.
SECTION 24.  ORS 285B.746 is amended to read:
285B.746. (1) The Oregon Business Development Department may approve a loan  requested in
an application filed under ORS 285B.743 if, after investigation, it finds that:
(a) The applicant is enrolled in  a small business management program with a small business
development center or certified entity;
(b) The applicant has prepared a business plan  for the business, which has been reviewed by a
small business development center or other entity certified by the  department to review business
plans; and
(c) The applicant is not effectively owned or controlled by  another business entity or other
person that, either by itself or when combined with the applicant, is  not eligible for a loan under
ORS 285B.740 to 285B.758.
(2) In addition to the requirements for loan approval described in subsection (1) of this  section,
in order to obtain a loan under ORS 285B.740  to 285B.758, an applicant must also satisfy one of the
following  conditions:
(a) The business  must have annual revenues of [ $500,000] $1,500,000 or less in the 12-month pe-
riod immediately preceding the date of application.
(b) The business or proposed business must be owned, in whole or  in part, by a person certified
as having a severe disability by the Department of  Human Services or the Commission for the Blind.
(c) The applicant must submit proof to the Oregon Business Development Department that  the
applicant is a veteran who:
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 13
(A) Has a United States Department of Veterans Affairs total disability rating of at least 70
percent as a result of an injury or illness  that the veteran incurred, or that was aggravated, during
active military service; and
(B) Received a discharge or release under other than dishonorable conditions.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 285B.746, as amended by section 24 of this 2020 second special session Act,
is amended to read:
285B.746. (1) The  Oregon Business Development Department may approve a loan requested in
an application filed under ORS 285B.743 if, after investigation, it finds that:
(a) The applicant is enrolled in a small business management  program with a small business
development center or certified entity;
(b) The applicant has prepared a business plan for the  business, which has been reviewed by a
small business development center or  other entity certified by the department to review business
plans; and
(c) The applicant is not effectively  owned or controlled by another business entity or other
person that, either by itself or when  combined with the applicant, is not eligible for a loan under
ORS 285B.740 to 285B.758.
(2) In  addition to the requirements for loan approval described in subsection (1) of this section,
in order to obtain a loan under ORS 285B.740  to 285B.758, an applicant must also satisfy one of the
following  conditions:
(a) The business must have annual revenues of [ $1,500,000] $500,000 or less  in the 12-month pe-
riod immediately preceding the date of application.
(b) The business or proposed business must be owned, in whole or  in part, by a person certified
as having a severe disability by the Department of  Human Services or the Commission for the Blind.
(c) The  applicant must submit proof to the Oregon Business Development Department that the
applicant is a veteran who:
(A) Has a United States Department of Veterans Affairs total disability rating of at least 70
percent as a result of an injury or illness  that the veteran incurred, or that was aggravated, during
active military service; and
(B) Received a discharge or release under other than dishonorable conditions.
SECTION 26.
 ORS 285B.749 is amended to read:
285B.749. (1) The Oregon Business Development Department may approve  an entrepreneurial
development loan under ORS 285B.740 to 285B.758 if, after investigation, it finds that:
(a) The loan has a reasonable prospect of repayment from cash flow and  collateral and is se-
cured by good and sufficient collateral; and
(b) The applicant provides equity funds for the project in the  form of cash or property in an
amount equal to or greater than 20 percent of the amount of the loan.
(2) The department shall determine  the amount of the initial loan and any subsequent loan to
the borrower. The maximum of all loans to a borrower from  the Oregon Entrepreneurial Develop-
ment Loan Fund may not exceed [ $100,000] $250,000.
(3) Entrepreneurial development loans  shall be made for a period not exceeding 10 years at a
rate of interest that does not exceed 18 percent per annum.
SECTION 27.  ORS 285B.749, as amended by section 26 of this 2020 second special session Act,
is amended to read:
285B.749. (1) The Oregon Business Development Department may approve  an entrepreneurial
development loan under ORS 285B.740 to 285B.758 if, after investigation, it finds that:
(a) The loan has a reasonable prospect of repayment from cash flow and  collateral and is se-
cured by good and sufficient collateral; and
(b) The applicant provides equity funds for the project in the  form of cash or property in an
amount equal to or greater than 20 percent of the amount of the loan.
(2) The department shall determine  the amount of the initial loan and any subsequent loan to
the borrower. The maximum of all loans to a borrower from  the Oregon Entrepreneurial Develop-
ment Loan Fund may not exceed [ $250,000] $100,000.
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 14
(3) Entrepreneurial development loans  shall be made for a period not exceeding 10 years at a
rate of interest that does not exceed 18 percent per annum.
SECTION 28. The amendments to ORS 285B.746 and 285B.749 by sections  24 and 26 of this
2020 second special session Act apply to loans approved on or before December 31, 2021.
SECTION 29. (1) The amendments to ORS 285B.746 and 285B.749 by sections 25 and 27 of
this 2020 second special session Act become operative January 1, 2022.
(2) The amendments to ORS 285B.746 and 285B.749 by sections 25  and 27 of this 2020
second special session Act apply to loans approved  on or after the date specified in sub-
section (1) of this section.
DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE
SECTION 30.  ORS 147.225 is amended to read:
147.225. There is established the  Criminal Injuries Compensation Account. All moneys in the
account are continuously appropriated for and may be used by the  Department of Justice for the
purposes authorized in ORS 147.005 to 147.367 , 147.390 and 147.397.
SECTION 31.  ORS 147.390 is amended to read:
147.390. [(1) Notwithstanding that a child is not a victim under ORS 147.015  (1)(a), in cases of
suspected child  sexual abuse as described in ORS 419B.005 (1)(a)(C), (D) or (E), or child physical
abuse by an adult or caretaker as  otherwise described in ORS 419B.005 (1)(a)(A), compensation may
be made on behalf of the child for services provided by  a children’s advocacy center, including a child
abuse assessment, a medical assessment or a forensic interview, if: ]
[(a) The expenses are actually paid or incurred by the applicant; and ]
[(b) A claim is filed on behalf of the child in the manner provided in ORS 147.015. ]
[(2) The Department of Justice may pay compensation for child abuse assessments  or medical as-
sessments required by ORS 419B.023 regardless of whether a finding of abuse is made and only  if
other insurance is unavailable. If  the department pays compensation, the department shall pay the
compensation directly to the provider of the  services. The medical fee schedules for payment under this
section shall be the schedules adopted under ORS 147.035. ]
(1) In cases of suspected child sexual abuse as  described in ORS 419B.005 (1)(a)(C), (D)
or (E), or child physical abuse by an adult or caretaker as otherwise  described in ORS
419B.005 (1)(a)(A), the Department of Justice may pay for services provided  by a children’s
advocacy center,  including child abuse assessments, medical assessments and forensic
interviews. Payments under this section may be  made regardless of whether a finding of
abuse is made. The department shall make  payments under this section directly to the
children’s advocacy center.
(2) A children’s advocacy center may not charge the department more  for medical ser-
vices than the  maximum amounts established in the medical fee schedules adopted under
ORS 147.035.
(3) As used in this  section, “child abuse assessment,” “children’s advocacy center,” “forensic
interview” and “medical assessment” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 418.782.
SECTION 32.  ORS 180.095 is amended to read:
180.095. (1) The Department of Justice Protection and Education Revolving Account is created
in the General Fund. All moneys in the account are continuously appropriated  to the Department
of Justice and may be used to pay for only the following activities:
(a) Restitution and refunds in proceedings described in paragraph (c) of this subsection;
(b) Consumer and  business education relating to the laws governing antitrust[ ,] and  unlawful
trade practices [ and the environment ]; and
(c) Personal services, travel, meals, lodging and all other costs and  expenses incurred by the
department in  investigating, preparing, commencing and prosecuting the following actions and suits,
and enforcing  judgments, settlements, compromises and assurances of voluntary compliance arising
out of the following actions and suits:
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 15
(A) Actions and suits under the state and federal antitrust laws;
(B) Actions and suits under ORS 336.184 and 646.605 to 646.656;
[(C) Criminal prosecutions under state and federal environmental laws; ]
[(D)] (C) Actions commenced under ORS 59.331; and
[(E)] (D)  Actions and suits under ORS 180.750 to 180.785.
(2) Moneys in the Department  of Justice Protection and Education Revolving Account are not
subject to allotment. Upon request of the Attorney General, the State Treasurer shall create sub-
accounts within the account for  the purposes of managing moneys in the account and allocating
those moneys to the activities described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, all sums of money received by the Department of Jus-
tice  under  a judgment, settlement, compromise or assurance of voluntary compliance, including
damages, restitution, refunds, attorney fees, costs,  disbursements and other recoveries, but excluding
civil penalties under ORS 646.642, in proceedings described in subsection  (1)(c) of this section shall,
upon receipt,  be deposited with the State Treasurer to the credit of the Department of Justice Pro-
tection and Education Revolving Account. However, if the  action or suit was based on an expendi-
ture or loss from a public  body or a dedicated fund, the amount of such expenditure or loss, after
deduction of attorney fees and expenses awarded to the department by  the court or agreed to by the
parties, if any, shall be credited to the public body or dedicated fund  and the remainder thereof
credited to the Department of Justice Protection and Education Revolving Account.
(4) If the Department of Justice recovers restitution  or refunds in a proceeding described in
subsection (1)(c) of this section, and the department cannot  determine the persons to whom the
restitution or refunds should be paid or  the amount of the restitution or refund payable to individual
claimants is de minimis, the restitution or refunds may not be deposited in the Department of Justice
Protection and Education Revolving Account and shall be deposited in the General Fund.
(5) Before April 1 of each odd-numbered year, the Department of Justice shall report to the Joint
Committee on Ways and Means:
(a) The department’s  projection of the balance in the Department of Justice Protection and Ed-
ucation Revolving Account at the  end of the biennium in which the report is made and at the end
of the following biennium;
(b) The amount of the balance held for restitution and refunds;
(c) An estimate of  the department’s anticipated costs and expenses under subsection (1)(b) and
(c) of this section for the biennium in which the report is  made and for the following biennium; and
(d) Any judgment,  settlement, compromise or other recovery, the proceeds of which are used for
purposes other than:
(A) For deposit into the Department of Justice Protection and Education Revolving  Account;
or
(B) For payment of legal costs related to the  judgment, settlement, compromise or other recov-
ery.
(6) The Joint Committee on  Ways and Means, after consideration of recommendations made by
the Department of Justice, shall use the  information reported under subsection (5) of this section to
determine an appropriate balance for the revolving account.
SECTION 33.
The amendments  to ORS 180.095 by section 32 of this 2020 second special
session Act become operative September 1, 2020.
HOUSING AND COMMUNITY SERVICES DEPARTMENT
AND DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES
SECTION 34. Moneys allocated to the Housing and Community Services Department by
the Emergency Board at its March  9, 2020, meeting (Item No. 2), for the provision of rapid
rehousing, including rental  assistance, to victims of February 2020 flooding in Umatilla
County, including residents of the Umatilla Indian  reservation, may be utilized for develop-
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 16
ment of new  affordable housing units for victims of February 2020 flooding in Umatilla
County, including residents of the Umatilla Indian reservation.
SECTION 35. Of the moneys allocated to the Housing and Community Services  Depart-
ment by the Emergency Board  at its March 9, 2020, meeting (Item No. 3), to replace housing
and infrastructure damaged or lost in Umatilla County or on the  Umatilla Indian reservation
due to flooding in February 2020, up to  $3,000,000 may be utilized for the development of new
affordable housing units for victims of February 2020 flooding in Umatilla County, including
residents of the Umatilla Indian reservation.
SECTION 36. The amount of  $3,000,000 is transferred from the Manufactured Dwelling
Parks Account  established under ORS 456.579 to the General Housing Account of the Oregon
Housing Fund established under ORS 458.620 (1)(e) to be utilized for providing operating
support to affordable rental housing properties with long-term affordability covenants with
the Housing and Community Services Department that have been impacted by tenants’ re-
duction of  income due to the COVID-19 pandemic or eviction moratoria established by
chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session).
SECTION 37.
 Section 4, chapter 574, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 4. (1) Sections 1 [ to] and 3  [ of this 2019 Act ], chapter 574, Oregon Laws 2019,  are re-
pealed on [ July 1, 2022 ] the effective date of this 2020 second special session Act .
(2) Section 2, chapter 574, Oregon Laws 2019, is repealed on July 1, 2022.
SECTION 38.
The Wildfire Damage Housing Relief Account  of the Oregon Housing Fund
established under ORS 458.620 is abolished. Any moneys remaining in the account on the
operative date of this section shall be transferred to the General Fund for  general govern-
mental purposes.
SECTION 39.  ORS 458.620 is amended to read:
458.620. (1) There is created, separate and distinct from the General  Fund of the State Treasury,
the Oregon Housing Fund, which consists of [ six] five separate revolving accounts:
(a) The Housing Development and Guarantee Account;
(b) The Emergency Housing Account;
(c) The Home Ownership Assistance Account;
(d) The Farmworker Housing Development Account;  and
(e) The General Housing Account[ ; and ].
[(f) The Wildfire Damage Housing Relief Account. ]
(2) Earnings on investment of moneys in:
(a) The Housing Development and Guarantee Account accrue to that account.
(b) The Emergency Housing Account accrue to that account.
(c) The Home Ownership Assistance Account accrue to that account.
(d) The Farmworker Housing Development Account accrue to that account.
(e) The General Housing Account accrue to that account.
[(f) The Wildfire Damage Housing Relief Account accrue to that account. ]
(3)(a) Moneys in the Housing Development and Guarantee Account are continuously appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department to carry out  the provisions of ORS
458.630.
(b) Moneys in the Emergency Housing Account are  continuously appropriated to the department
to carry out the provisions of ORS 458.650.
(c) Moneys  in the Home Ownership Assistance Account are continuously appropriated to the
department to carry out the provisions of ORS 458.655.
(d) Moneys in the Farmworker Housing Development Account are continuously appropriated to
the department to carry out the provisions of ORS 458.660.
(e) Moneys in the General Housing Account  are continuously appropriated to the department
to carry out the provisions of ORS 456.515 to 456.725.
[(f) Moneys in the Wildfire Damage Housing Relief Account are continuously appropriated to  the
department to carry out the provisions of ORS 458.667. ]
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 17
(4) Individuals and corporations,  both for profit or nonprofit, may make monetary contributions
to be credited to:
(a) The Housing Development and Guarantee Account; or
(b) The General Housing Account.
SECTION 40.
ORS 458.667 is repealed.
SECTION 40a. Section 38 of this 2020 second special  session Act, the amendments to ORS
458.620 by section 39 of this 2020 second special session Act  and the repeal of ORS 458.667
by section 40 of this 2020 second special session Act become operative May 31, 2021.
SECTION 41. (1) As used in this section, “COVID-19 housing funds” means:
(a) Federal funds that the Housing and Community Services Department administers if
the funds are designated for mortgage assistance and  are made available through a federal
law whose purpose is providing aid in response to COVID-19; and
(b) Federal funds received by the state under the Emergency Solutions Grants  program
as authorized under subtitle B of title IV of the McKinney-Vento  Homeless Assistance Act
(42 U.S.C. 11371 et seq.), as amended, and  made available under the Coronavirus Aid, Relief,
and Economic Security Act (P.L. 116-136).
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 458.505, the department may disburse COVID-19 housing funds
through grants and loans to  local governments as defined in ORS 197.015, tribes as defined
in ORS 273.462, individuals, housing authorities  as defined in ORS 456.005, nonprofit corpo-
rations as defined in ORS 65.001  and community action agencies as described in ORS 458.505.
(3) The  department, in its sole discretion, may allocate the funds in any method that
ensures statewide geographic coverage without  regard to an existing distribution formula,
including through a competitive grant or contract process.
SECRETARY OF STATE
SECTION 42. Notwithstanding ORS 56.041, and in addition to transfers required  by ORS
56.041 (4), the amount of $263,037 is transferred from  the Operating Account to the General
Fund for general governmental purposes. The transfer shall be made on September 30, 2020.
SECTION 43. Notwithstanding ORS 177.140, the amount of $583,292 is transferred from
the Secretary  of State Administration Division Account to the General Fund for general
governmental purposes. The transfer shall be made on September 30, 2020.
SECTION 44. Notwithstanding ORS 297.535, the amount of $921,869 is transferred from
the Division of Audits Account to the General Fund for  general governmental purposes. The
transfer shall be made on September 30, 2020.
OREGON DEPARTMENT OF AVIATION
SECTION 45. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 835.060, the Oregon Department of Aviation may
expend moneys in the State Aviation Account for operating expenses of the department.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 836.072 (6), the percentage of the combined tax revenue from
aircraft fuel used or distributed by  a dealer and aircraft fuel usable in aircraft operated by
turbine engines that may be used for operating expenses of the department is not limited.
(3) Notwithstanding section 7 (4), chapter 700, Oregon Laws 2015:
(a) Ten percent of the amounts described in section 7 (1), chapter 700, Oregon Laws 2015,
are appropriated to the department for the purposes specified in section 7  (4)(a), chapter 700,
Oregon Laws 2015, and for operating expenses of the department.
(b) The remaining 90 percent of the amounts described  in section 7 (1), chapter 700,
Oregon Laws 2015, shall be distributed as specified in section  7 (4)(b), chapter 700, Oregon
Laws 2015.
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 18
SECTION 46. Section 45 of this 2020 second special session Act  is repealed on June 30,
2021.
IN-HOME ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS
SECTION 47.  Section 7, chapter 680, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 7. (1) Section 1 [ of this 2019 Act ], chapter 680, Oregon Laws 2019,  and  the amendments
to ORS 443.065[ , 443.315] and 443.325 [ and section 2, chapter 75, Oregon Laws 2018, ] by sections 3
[to 6] and 5 [of this 2019 Act ], chapter 680, Oregon Laws 2019, become operative on [ January] July
1, 2021.
(2) The amendments to ORS 443.315 by section  4, chapter 680, Oregon Laws 2019, become
operative on January 1, 2022.
(3) The amendments to ORS 410.598 by section  6, chapter 680, Oregon Laws 2019, become
operative on January 1, 2021.
SECTION 48. Section 8, chapter 680, Oregon Laws 2019, is repealed.
TRANSFERS FOR GENERAL GOVERNMENTAL PURPOSES
SECTION 49.  Section 4, chapter 643, Oregon Laws 2019 is amended to read:
Sec 4.  Notwithstanding  ORS 180.095, the amount of [ $46,000,000] $50,666,667 is transferred from
the Department of Justice Protection  and Education Revolving Account to the General Fund for
general governmental purposes. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 50.  Section 2, chapter 643, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  Notwithstanding ORS 283.076,  the amount of [ $50,900,000] $58,900,000 is transferred from
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services Operating  Fund to the General Fund for general
governmental purposes. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 51.  Section 3, chapter 643, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  Notwithstanding ORS 276A.209, the amount of [ $26,500,000] $33,500,000 is transferred
from the State Information Technology Operating Fund to the General Fund  for general govern-
mental purposes. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 52.  Section 7, chapter 643, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  Notwithstanding ORS 243.167,  the amount of [ $15,000,000] $63,000,000 is transferred from
the Public Employees’ Revolving Fund to the General Fund  for general governmental purposes. The
transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 53. Notwithstanding ORS 180.180, the  amount of $2,000,000 is transferred from
the Department of  Justice Operating Account to the General Fund for general governmental
purposes. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 54. Notwithstanding ORS 128.670, 128.675 and 180.180, the amount of  $2,300,000
is transferred  from the Department of Justice Operating Account, from moneys subject to
ORS 128.670 (9), to the General Fund for general governmental purposes.  The transfer shall
be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 55. Notwithstanding ORS 180.180, the amount of $800,000 is transferred from
the Department of  Justice Operating Account to the General Fund for general governmental
purposes. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 56. Notwithstanding ORS 180.205, the amount of $500,000 is transferred  from
the Tobacco Enforcement Fund to the General Fund for general governmental purposes.  The
transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 57. Notwithstanding ORS 279A.290, the amount of $5,000,000 is transferred from
the Miscellaneous Receipts account for the State Treasurer to the General  Fund for general
governmental purposes. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 19
SECTION 58. Notwithstanding section 24, chapter  105, Oregon Laws 2018, the amount of
$33,133,022 is transferred from the School Districts Unfunded  Liability Fund to the General
Fund for general governmental purposes. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 59. Notwithstanding ORS 414.815, the amount  of $2,100,000 is transferred from
the Law Enforcement Medical Liability Account to  the General Fund for general govern-
mental purposes. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 60. Notwithstanding ORS 327.008 and 327.026, the amount of $1,500,000 is
transferred from the State School Fund, from  moneys allocated to the Youth Corrections
Education Program and the Juvenile Detention Education Program,  to the General Fund for
general governmental purposes. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 61. Notwithstanding ORS 342.953, the amount  of $9,000,000 is transferred from
the Educator Advancement Fund to the General Fund for general governmental purposes.
The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 62.
Notwithstanding ORS 346.315, the amount of $500,000 is transferred  from
the Blind and Visually Impaired Student Fund to the General Fund for general  governmental
purposes. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 63. Notwithstanding ORS 652.409, the  amount of $1,500,000 is transferred from
the Wage Security Fund to the  General Fund for general governmental purposes. The
transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
WATER SUPPLY DEVELOPMENT ACCOUNT
SECTION 64.  Section 20, chapter 725, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 20.  An expenditure of moneys from the Water Supply Development Account  is not subject
to any application process or public benefit scoring or ranking under ORS  541.663, 541.666, 541.669,
541.673 or 541.677 if the expenditure is for a purpose:
(1) Specifically  identified in an appropriation to the account from the General Fund [ for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, ] for carrying out the purpose; or
(2) Specifically identified in legislation [ enacted by the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly ] that
authorizes a transfer of lottery bond proceeds to the account for carrying out the purpose.
SECTION 65. Section 21, chapter 725, Oregon Laws 2017, is repealed.
EDUCATION
SECTION 66. In addition to the uses of the  Early Learning Account that are authorized
by ORS 327.274, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, the Department of Education and the
Early Learning Division may expend up to  $6,900,000 from the Early Learning Account for
the purpose of funding the construction, renovation and equipping of early  learning and child
care facilities in a manner  that is consistent with the statewide early learning system plan
overseen by the Early Learning Council.
SECTION 67.  Section 3, chapter 122, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) In addition to and not in  lieu of the transfer under [ section 2 of this 2019 Act ] ORS
327.001, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, the Department of  Education shall transfer from
the Fund for Student Success to the State School Fund an amount that equals [ $200 million ]
$212,870,000.
(2) Notwithstanding [ section 2 (4)(a) of this 2019 Act ] ORS 327.001 (4)(a) , for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2019, the amount the Department of Education shall transfer  from the Fund for
Student Success to the State School Fund for the  purpose of a transfer under ORS 327.008 (11) to
the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348 shall be $20 million.
(3) Notwithstanding the percentage transfers prescribed by ORS 327.001 (4)(b), for  the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, the Department of Education shall transfer moneys to the
education accounts identified in ORS 327.001 (4)(b) as follows:
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 20
(a) To the Student Investment Account established in ORS 327.175, $150,000,000.
(b) To the Early Learning Account established in ORS 327.269, $170,518,281.
(c) To the Statewide Education  Initiatives Account established in ORS 327.250,
$246,622,099.
TRANSPORTATION
SECTION 68.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 367.080 to  367.086 and subject to subsection (2) of
this section and the availability of funds, the Department of Transportation shall  distribute
$5,000,000 from the moneys in the  Connect Oregon Fund, other than moneys dedicated for
purposes described in Article XV, section  4a, of the Oregon Constitution, for the Oregon
International Port of Coos Bay Rail Line Repairs and Bridge Replacement project.
(2) As a prerequisite to receiving a distribution under this section, and no  later than
November 1, 2020, the Oregon International  Port of Coos Bay shall prepare and submit a plan
to the Oregon Transportation Commission. The plan must, at  a minimum, certify when and
how the port plans to spend the moneys for  the project. The plan may provide for re-
imbursement of  a maximum of five percent of the allocated moneys for development of the
plan. The commission shall promptly review a submitted plan and if the commission ap-
proves the plan, the Department of Transportation shall distribute the moneys after adopting
an agreement with the port. The agreement shall follow rules adopted by the commission  for
projects that receive grants from the Connect Oregon Fund.
FORESTRY
SECTION 69. (1) The Oregon  Department of Administrative Services may enter into a
contract for an independent economist to:
(a) Collect data and other information regarding:
(A) The actual costs of wildfire protection and wildfire suppression  on lands protected
by the State Forestry Department; and
(B) The source of moneys used  to pay costs of wildfire protection and wildfire sup-
pression on lands protected by the State Forestry Department;
(b) Identify ways to improve tracking and substantiation  for costs described in paragraph
(a)(A) of  this subsection and for funding sources described in paragraph (a)(B) of this sub-
section, including but not limited to appropriate in-kind contributions;
(c) Compare Oregon costs and  funding sources for wildfire protection and wildfire sup-
pression on lands protected by the  State Forestry Department with costs and funding
sources for wildfire protection and wildfire suppression in comparable states;
(d) Identify regional differences in costs and funding sources for wildfire protection and
wildfire suppression on lands protected by the State Forestry Department; and
(e) Provide data and information described in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection in
a format that will enable  an informed discussion regarding the equitable allocation of wildfire
protection and  wildfire suppression costs on lands protected by the State Forestry Depart-
ment and regarding the value of that  wildfire protection and wildfire suppression toward the
protection of private and public assets.
(2) The economist  contracting with the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
under subsection (1) of this section shall perform  the work in collaboration with a project
team or technical advisory  group convened and overseen by the department. The project
team or technical advisory group shall consist of the following, each of whom  must have
expertise regarding costs and funding sources for wildfire protection and  wildfire sup-
pression:
(a) The following members appointed by the Governor:
(A) One representative of the State Forestry Department; and
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 21
(B) One representative of the Emergency Fire Cost Committee; and
(b) The following members jointly  appointed by the President of the Senate and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives:
(A) One representative of the Legislative Fiscal Office;
(B) One representative of the Legislative Revenue Officer;
(C) One representative of the forest industry;
(D) One small woodland owner; and
(E) Two representatives of public interest groups.
(3) The economist and the project team or technical advisory  group shall complete the
work described in subsection (1) of  this section and report the resulting findings and re-
commendations to  the Governor’s Council on Wildfire Response and to a committee of the
Legislative Assembly relating to natural resources, in the manner provided under  ORS
192.245, no later than March 1, 2021.
STUDENT INVESTMENT ACCOUNT
SECTION 70.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 327.180 and  for the 2020-2021 school year only, the
recipient of a  grant received under ORS 327.195 is encouraged to prioritize the use of grant
moneys for the purpose of meeting students’ mental or behavioral health needs.
(2)(a) A  school district or public charter school that submitted a grant application or
entered into a  grant agreement for moneys to be used for the 2020-2021 school year may
submit an amended grant application or enter into an amended grant agreement  for the
2020-2021 school year.
(b) For the purposes of receiving an amended grant application or amended grant agree-
ment, the Department of Education may modify or waive  processes and requirements pre-
scribed by ORS 327.185 based on rules adopted by the State Board of Education.
(c) The department shall prescribe the format and timelines for the submission of  an
amended grant application or amended grant agreement under this section.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 327.190 and for the 2020-2021 school  year only, a grant recipient
is not required to meet longitudinal performance growth targets.  The department may,
however, develop other  applicable performance growth targets and indicators of progress.
Nothing in this subsection prohibits the department from providing  technical assistance un-
der ORS 327.208 or from administering the intensive program under ORS 327.222.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 71. The unit captions used in this 2020 second special session Act are  provided
only for the convenience of the  reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this
state or express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2020 second  special session
Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 72. This 2020 second special session Act being necessary  for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to  exist, and
this 2020 second special session Act takes effect on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 22
Passed by House August 10, 2020
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate August 10, 2020
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4304 (HB 4304-INTRO) Page 23